Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.260

Procedure on appeal—Appellate review.

Appellate review of the judgment of the superior court may be obtained as in other cases if sought within fifteen days after the date of the entry of the judgment in the superior court.

[ 1988 c 202 s 36; 1971 c 81 s 91; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.260. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 8; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Appeal procedures superseded by RAP 2.1, 2.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.